Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1041.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 443.16. Medical Assistance for Complex Care Assistant Services.--(a) No later than one year after the effective date of this subsection and subject to Federal approval, the department shall establish a program in which a family member of a recipient of medical assistance may be certified as a complex care assistant and, after receiving the certification may, under the direction of a registered nurse, provide complex care assistant services to the recipient through a home health agency under the reimbursement rates specified 12345678910111213141516171819 under subsection (g). The program shall operate as a home health care service benefit under the medical assistance program. For the purpose of the program, a recipient shall meet any of the following criteria:(1) The recipient shall be younger than twenty-one years of age.(2) The recipient shall qualify for private duty nursing services under the medical assistance program.(3) The recipient can receive both complex care assistance and private duty nursing services if it is deemed medically necessary. Complex care assistance services are meant as a supplement to private duty nursing and not a replacement.(b) The department shall develop an assessment tool to identify recipients who meet the criteria specified under subsection (a).(c) (1) A complex care assistant must meet the training and competency evaluation program standards for home health aides established at 42 CFR 483.151 (relating to state review and approval of nurse aide training and competency evaluation programs), 483.152 (relating to requirements for approval of a nurse aide training and competency evaluation program), 483.154 (relating to nurse aide competency evaluation) and 484.80 (relating to condition of participation: home health aide services), including completing seventy-five hours of training and a competency evaluation.(2) A home health aide may, except for skilled tasks, provide complex care assistant services to their child.(d) A home health agency that employs a family member of a recipient shall pay all costs for the family member to become certified as a complex care assistant under the program before 20250SB1041PN1253 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 providing complex care assistant services. The family member who becomes certified as a complex care assistant under the program shall not be required to repay or reimburse the home health agency for the costs incurred by the family member to become certified as a complex care assistant.(e) A family member of a recipient who becomes certified as a complex care assistant under the program shall perform all of the following tasks under the scope of practice of a complex care assistant as applicable for the recipient:(1) The tasks associated with t ransferring, positioning, ambulation, feeding, personal care, catheter care, range of motion, vital signs, blood pressure, medication administration, enteral care and therapy.(2) Administering enteral feedings, including the tasks associated with formula types and preparation.(3) Other tasks approved by the Department of Health for a family member who becomes certified as a complex care assistant under the program.(f) Notwithstanding subsection (e), a home visit to a recipient that is required by the medical assistance program shall be conducted by a r egistered nurse every thirty days. (g) C omplex care assistant services provided by a family member of a recipient who becomes certified as a complex care assistant under the program shall be reimbursed to a home health agency under the medical assistance program at a provider rate of no less than forty-five dollars ($45) per hour.(h) The parent or guardian of a medical assistance enrollee shall choose whether to participate in the program. A Medicaid-enrolled home health provider may choose whether to participate in the program.20250SB1041PN1253 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) Medical assistance shall seek Federal approval, including seeking the appropriate Federal waiver or State plan amendment, to exclude income earned through employment as a complex care assistant from the family's countable income.(j) Medical assistance shall convene an advisory working group of stakeholders to provide guidance and expertise regarding implementing the complex care assistant program. Medicaid shall convene this advisory working group within sixty days after the effective date of this subsection. This working group may include representatives of home health agencies, physicians, or other medical practitioners with medical experience with the population being served by the program, representatives from a children's hospital or children's facilities and medically fragile family advocacy groups or family members as described in subsection (c).(k) No later than three years after the date the program is established under this section, the Deputy Secretary of the Office of Medical Assistance Programs shall prepare and submit a report to the Governor and the General Assembly concerning the viability of the program and recommendations concerning the program. Medical assistance may not require a home health agency to provide information or data for this report, except if the home health agency is paid by Medicaid.(l) The department shall seek a State plan amendment or Federal waiver as necessary for the purpose of implementing this section.(m) The department shall promulgate regulations as necessary to implement this section.(n) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless 20250SB1041PN1253 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Family member" includes a legal guardian, an individual related by blood or marriage and any other individual with a close association that is the equivalent of a family relationship."Skilled tasks" means tasks involving medical administration, enteral care and therapy.Section 2. If a State plan amendment or Federal waiver necessary for the addition of section 443.16 of the act is approved or is not necessary, the Secretary of Human Services shall transmit a notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 3. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) Section 2 of this act and this section shall take effect immediately.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect upon the publication of the notice under section 2 of this act.20250SB1041PN1253 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718